Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.56.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the board of directors of the corporation;

“corporation” means the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation created by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am §§ 5 — 10 ch 81 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 167 SLA 1978; am § 31 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 115 SLA 1981; am §§ 34, 35 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 39 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 8 ch 41 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 52 SLA 1991; am § 101 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

18.56.210

.
Renumbered in 1986.